Utah statutes.
73-26-402.   Rulemaking power of the board.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board may make rules to:

(1)  determine water charges as provided in Section 73-26-506;

(2)  administer and operate the reservoirs and associated facilities constructed in accordance with Section 73-26-301;

(3)  establish procedures for reviewing offers to contract for the sale or lease of developed water; and

(4)  set the interest rate for repayment of construction and environmental mitigation costs.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

